Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.210

Certain counseling or guidance not prohibited. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting any individual from offering counseling or guidance provided that such individuals do not hold themselves forth as psychologists.

[ 1965 c 70 s 25.]

PDFRCW 18.83.210

Certain counseling or guidance not prohibited. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting any individual from offering counseling or guidance provided that such individuals do not hold themselves forth as psychologists or licensed psychological associates.

[ 2024 c 371 s 12; 1965 c 70 s 25.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.